Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. University of Alaska Scholarships for High School Graduates.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 20-22.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 32-34.

Sec. 14.43.010.
Scholarships for dormitory rent.

The high school student in each graduating class in each high school in the state who, upon the completion of four years of high school work in a high school in the state, obtains the highest average standing for all the credits earned, and who is graduated at an annual commencement is entitled to receive, during dormitory residence at the University of Alaska, a scholarship covering dormitory rent for a period of two years following the year of graduation upon presenting to the registrar of the university a certificate signed by the superintendent or principal of the high school from which the student graduated stating that the graduate named is entitled to receive the benefits of the scholarship. Dormitory residence is governed by the rules and regulations established by the Board of Regents.

History.

(§ 37-10-41 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.460

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.015.
Alternate upon refusal or failure to accept.

If a person entitled to receive the benefit of AS

14.43.010

declines or fails to accept it, the graduate next in line in class standing is entitled to receive the benefit.

History.

(§ 37-10-42 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.470

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.020.
Applications for and issuance and report of certificates.

A certificate shall be applied for and issued to a graduate before August 2 of each year and shall be reported immediately to the registrar of the University of Alaska by the superintendent or principal issuing it.

History.

(§ 37-10-43 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.480

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.025.
Forfeiture of scholarship benefits.

Failure to do passing work in more than one subject during a semester, or withdrawal or expulsion from the University of Alaska, constitutes a forfeiture during the following semester or semesters of the benefits of AS

14.43.010

and

14.43.015

.

History.

(§ 37-10-44 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.490

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.030.
Payment of scholarships.

Payment of the scholarships shall be made monthly to the University of Alaska upon vouchers drawn upon the Department of Administration and duly certified by the treasurer and the president of the Board of Regents.
Payments may not be made in excess of amounts specifically appropriated for this purpose.

History.

(§ 37-10-45 ACLA 1949; am § 23 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.500. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.